Connecticut, session 2026, SB00315.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
2 title 26 of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Energy and
3 Environmental Protection shall provide for the release of two sterile
4 carp in Pachaug Pond in the town of Griswold.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section